Utah statutes.
38-1a-304.   Liens on multiple properties in one claim.

(1)  A claimant may claim a preconstruction or construction lien against two or more improvements owned by the same person.

(2)  If a claimant claims a preconstruction or construction lien against two or more improvements owned by the same person, the claimant shall designate the amount claimed to be due on each of the improvements.

